Chapter Three - Watershed Management Programs and Initiatives The State of Maryland has adopted many initiatives aimed at improving water quality in its streams, rivers and lakes.
These initiatives seek to maintain healthy watersheds, watersheds where urban, agricultural, forestry and other activities are managed to control nonpoint source pollution.
The state has formed innovative partnerships with the federal government, neighboring states, local governments, private businesses and the public to improve watershed health.
Major watershed initiatives include: The Chesapeake Bay Program, the Anacostia River Initiative, the Coastal Bays Program, the Susquehanna River Basin Commission, the Interstate Commission on the Potomac River Basin and the Chesapeake Bay Critical Area Program.
Fish passage: Through 1998, completion of fish passage projects had opened a total of 635 miles of bay tributaries.
In 2003, the goal is for Bay Program partners to open 1,357 miles for migratory fish to reach spawning areas.
Out of this partnership Maryland has developed its Tributary Strategies Program and the Targeted Watershed Project.
The Tributary Strategy Program is a comprehensive approach aimed at reducing nutrients entering the Bay.
Tributary teams actively involve local governments and citizens to address nonpoint source pollution problems.
On another front, the Department of Natural Resources through its Targeted Watershed project, has worked closely with other state and local agencies to coordinate watershed monitoring and restoration activities.
In addition to these major watershed initiatives, Maryland has a comprehensive planning strategy aimed at managing growth, managing and restoring State lakes and ensuring safe public drinking water.
Maryland's Smart Growth initiative seeks to reduce the amount of natural land lost to development and requires local jurisdictions through their planning process to protect environmentally sensitive areas.
Through these innovative partnerships, the state hopes to achieve significant environmental improvement in Maryland's watersheds.
As part of the Clean Water Action Plan, the state recently conducted an assessment of watershed health.
This Unified Watershed Assessment has assisted the state in identifying those waters that do not meet clean water or other natural resource goals.
The state is in the process of developing watershed restoration action strategies for watersheds in need of restoration.
These watershed restoration action strategies will complement the activities that are already being implemented through these major initiatives.
The Chesapeake Bay Program
To accommodate future growth, local jurisdictions are authorized under the Critical Area Act to change a land use designation and allow development at a density or intensity which exceeds the limits of a site's original designation.
Local governments may use a portion of its growth allocation to change a designation from Resource Conservation Area to either Limited Development Area or Intensely Developed Area or to change a Limited Development Area to an Intensely Developed Area.
The following limitations apply to a local government's use of growth allocation:
o A jurisdiction's growth allocation reserve consists of the number of acres representing five percent of its Resource Conservation Area lands, minus Federal property and tidal wetlands.
o All Critical Area requirements relating to Habitat Protection Areas must be met regardless of the new land use designation.
o A local jurisdiction must follow certain guidelines when deciding to change a Critical Area designation through the use of growth allocation.
These guidelines provide that new development should be located:
o within or adjacent to existing developed areas;
o in an area and in a manner that optimizes benefits to water quality;
o at least 300 feet beyond the landward edge of tidal waters and tidal wetlands; and,
o for new Intensely Developed Areas, that they are located where they minimize impacts to adjacent Resource Conservation Areas.
o When growth allocation is approved by a local jurisdiction, the Commission must approve the change in land use designation as an amendment to the local program.
The Commission's standard for review is that an amendment must be consistent with the goals and Criteria of the Critical Area Program.
Each jurisdiction within the Critical Area implements its own local program.
Through its oversight role, the Critical Area Commission ensures that the proper amount of growth allocation acreage is deducted from a jurisdiction's reserve and that Habitat Protection Areas are properly identified and protected.
Locational decisions are the purview of the local jurisdiction.
Growth Management
Background
Three hundred and fifty years ago the geographical area now comprising the State of Maryland was almost completely forested.
Over time the landscape has undergone tremendous change.
Today, Maryland is approximately 44% forested with most of these forests occurring in Western Maryland.
As Maryland's population continues to grow, more natural lands will be lost to development.
Currently, 11% of the State's land is developed.
The loss of natural cover (forests, meadows, wetlands etc.) to developed land uses has caused a decline in water quality and aquatic resources.
Research studies conducted across the country have documented the link between impervious cover (i.e., roads, roof tops, parking lots) in a watershed and the decline of water quality and stream health.
Nonpoint source pollution is the State's leading cause of water quality impairment and urbanization is major contributor of nonpoint source pollution.
It has become recognized that controlling the impact of development is one of the most important steps that can be taken to reduce nonpoint source pollution.
This is generally achieved at two levels.
At one level it is important to protect natural undeveloped lands from development through managed growth.
At the second level it is important to reduce the impact of development where it does occur.
In other words, how we develop is as important as where we develop.
Impacts of Imperviousness
Most of the precipitation that falls onto heavily vegetated landscapes either evaporates, transpires from plants, or infiltrates into the ground.
As vegetative cover is replaced with impervious cover (streets, parking lots, roof tops etc.), the water cycle is disrupted and runoff increases.
Increased runoff and a reduced groundwater recharge damage stream systems.
During heavy storm events, banks become scoured which causes erosion and sedimentation, and over time streams may become channelized.
As the groundwater table drops, streams loose water volume.
These and numerous other impacts impair water quality and create inhabitable conditions for living organisms.
The Maryland Department of Natural Resources, Monitoring and Non-Tidal Assessment Division has conducted the Maryland Biological Stream Survey (MBSS) and has investigated the association between land-use and the health stream biota.
The Survey analyzed the correlation between urbanization and various indices of biological integrity.
Results of the survey indicate that with increased urbanization, in all or most of the basins, fish and macroinvertebrate biological integrity, and aquatic salamander abundance decline.
Where to Develop
Placing development in areas suitable for development and away from rural areas is one of the most effective ways to reduce the consumption of land.
While land-use planning is the primary role of county governments, the legislature has enhanced the State's ability to guide land-use through various pieces of growth management legislation.
As a result, Maryland has become one the most progressive states in the nation on the issue of addressing sprawl development.
Economic Growth , Resource Protection and Planning Act
On October 1, 1992, the Maryland Economic Growth, Resource Protection and Planning Act of 1992 was enacted to reshape the way citizens, developers, the State, counties and towns address planning for growth and resource protection.
A premise of the Act is that the comprehensive plans prepared by counties and towns are the best place for local governments to establish priorities for growth and resource conservation, and that once those priorities are established, it is the State's aim to provide technical assistance to assist in resource conservation.
The visions of the Planning Act
The Act promulgated seven visions for managing growth:
o Development is concentrated in suitable areas;
o Sensitive areas are protected;
o In rural areas, growth is directed to existing population centers and resource areas are protected;
o Stewardship of the Chesapeake Bay and the land is a universal ethic;
o Conservation of resources, including a reduction in resource consumption, is practiced;
o To assure the achievement of 1 through 5 above, economic growth is encouraged and regulatory mechanisms are streamlined; and
o Funding mechanisms are addressed to achieve these visions.
Making these visions part of Maryland's planning and zoning enabling legislation gives jurisdictions a succinct statement of Maryland's priorities for their plans.
Counties throughout Maryland have incorporated these visions into their comprehensive plans.
New "Sensitive Areas Element" required in Local Plans
Article 66B required that plans prepared by local jurisdictions contain a series of "plan elements" such as a land use element, a community facility element and a variety of others.
In addition, all comprehensive plans prepared by local jurisdictions must include a sensitive areas element that contains goals, objectives, principles, and standards designed to protect sensitive areas from the adverse effects of development.
These areas include the following:
o streams and their buffers;
o 100-year floodplains;
o habitats of threatened and endangered species; and
o steep slopes
The sensitive areas element may also include other areas in need of special protection, as determined in the local comprehensive plan.
Most local jurisdictions have environmental policies, goals, and objectives in their comprehensive plans.
Also, most jurisdictions have environmental laws and regulations.
However, the environmental resources which are subject to local plans and regulations vary from jurisdiction to jurisdiction.
The Act therefore seeks protection of at least the above mentioned types of sensitive areas.
The Act permits local governments to define sensitive areas and determine the levels of protection.
Smart Growth and Neighborhood Conservation Initiatives
In its 1997 Session, the Maryland General Assembly strengthened Maryland's effort to guide growth by enacting the Neighborhood Conservation and Smart Growth Initiatives.
This legislative package marshaled the State's financial resources to support growth in Maryland's communities and to limit development in agricultural and other resource areas.
The Smart Growth Initiatives build upon and enhance the Economic Growth, Resource Protection, and Planning Act of 1992.
The centerpiece of this legislative package is the "Smart Growth Areas" legislation.
The law limits most state infrastructure funding and economic development, housing and other program monies to those places local governments determine suitable for growth, called "Priority Funding Areas."
This serves two objectives: It lends fiscal support to the local jurisdictions' choices for development areas.
However, it also assures that the State will not fund infrastructure in rural areas where development is undesired.
The Act designates specific PFAs throughout Maryland, including muncipalities, land inside the Baltimore Beltway, the Maryland portion of land within the Capital Beltway, and enterprise zones.
Counties may also designate PFAs based on the land use, water and sewer service, and residential density criteria contained in the Act.
The Act gives local governments flexibility to identify and determine the boundaries of communities, rural villages, and other public investment centers that will constitute Priority Funding Areas.
The counties comprehensive plan should be used to guide the mapping of PFAs in order to avoid arbitrary or capricious designations.
The other bills of this legislative package also support locally-identified development areas.
They facilitate the re-use of brownfields and provide tax credits to businesses creating jobs in a priority funding area.
A new Live Near Your Work pilot program supports this effort by providing cash contributions to workers buying homes in certain older neighborhoods.
All of these measures will encourage economic development and help stabilize older developed areas.
To spur more preservation of undeveloped land, the Rural Legacy Program provides financial resources for the protection of farm and forest lands and the conservation of these essential rural resources from development.
Rural Legacy Program
The purpose of the Rural Legacy Program is to protect Maryland's remaining rural landscapes and natural areas through the purchase of land or conservation easements.
The Rural Legacy Initiative is a "bottom up" program that must be initiated or endorsed by the appropriate local government.
Local governments work in cooperation with land trusts and individual citizens to identify Rural Legacy Areas.
The Rural Legacy Program will establish greenbelts of forests and farms around rural communities, protect critical native wildlife and plant habitat from development, support natural resource based economies, and protect riparian forests, wetlands and greenways that buffer Maryland's valuable tributaries and bays from pollution runoff.
Through a combination of existing parkland aquisition funds (Program Open Space) and general obligation bonds issued by the State, the Rural Legacy Program will fund a minimum of $71.3 million in grants during the first five years of the program, and conserve up to 200,000 acres by the year 2011.
In FY 98/99, the program's inaugural year, 20 counties submitted applications proposing 23 Rural Legacy Areas (RLAs) to protect 54,000 acres of land valued at $129 million, demonstrating that the program was popular and competition for funding high.
In all, the state designated 16 RLAs and committed $29 million to protect 14,000 acres.
For FY 2000, Governor Glendening announced an additional $25 million to protect more than 12,000 acres.
Combining the dollars from the first two years of the program's existence, the state now has dedicated $54 million to preserve more than 26,000 acres.
In doing so, the Governor designated six new Rural Legacy Areas and announced continued funding for 13 previously approved ones.
Brownfields Program
"Brownsfields" are either abandoned or underutilized industrial sites that are either polluted or perceived to be polluted.
While often strategically located near population and major transportation hubs, these sites are unattractive because of the uncertainty and risks involved in clean-up costs and future liability.
The 1997 law limits liability for those redeveloping these lands, unless they exacerbate contamination or create new pollution.
The Law created a voluntary clean-up program operated by the Maryland Department of the Environment.
An eligible developer wishing to participate must supply the Department information about environmental conditions, including contamination on the site and proposed clean-up procedures.
If MDE approves this application, the applicant prepares a detailed Response Action Plan which explains all tasks necessary to clean up the site and demonstrates that the project meets applicable public health and environmental protection criteria.
Once the plan is approved, the Department inspects all work on site before issuing a certificate of completion.
The certificate provides that the applicable clean up criteria have been met.
The law also established the Brownfields Revitalization Incentive Program.
This Program provides grants and low interest loans to fund brownfields redevelopment.
How to Develop
Consider this fact: over the next 20 years alone, the amount of land consumed by development in Maryland could surpass the amount of land developed over the last 200 years.
Through the 1997 Smart Growth initiative and other growth management programs, Maryland is working to reduce sprawl development and its impacts.
In spite of these efforts, the development of new land is a reality.
Therefore, how we build becomes critical in efforts to manage the environmental impacts of future growth and development.
The following are the state supported programs or initiatives that aid in reducing the "footprint" of development.
Low-Impact Development
Prince George's County Maryland has been the leader in developing the low-impact development technique.
The basic objectives of the low-impact development approach include: 1) restoring the site hydrologic regime to mimic the natural or predevelopment condition, 2) maintaining surface water and groundwater quality and minimizing the generation and off-site transport of pollutants, 3) minimizing disturbance of riparian habitat functions , and 4) preserving terrestrial habitat ecological functions and maximizing conservation of woodland and vegetative cover.
The Maryland Department of Natural Resources, Watershed Restoration Division (WRD) is working with Prince Georges County in investigating the use of low-impact development (LID) techniques to protect water quality.
WRD is currently experimenting with the LID technique.
With State Highway Administration funds, WRD built two bioretention facilities in the DNR building parking lot.
Bioretention facilities attempt to mimic the natural landscape processes by filtering polluted stormwater runoff.
These facilities, which contain highly organic soil, trees and shrubs, and sand and gravel, act to filter pollutants such as nutrients, metals, oil, grease and sediments.
Clean Water Act Section 319 funds have been used to monitor project effectiveness.
Green Building Program
Conventional land development and building practices are frequently at odds with environmental protection.
Sites are developed in a way that disrupt hydrology, create more impervious surface than is necessary, cause excessive erosion, degrade natural ecosystem function and disrupt native biodiversity.
Buildings are frequently designed and constructed in a way that consume too many precious natural resources and generate excessive waste.
The Mission of the Maryland's Green Building Program is to facilitate change in the way land development occurs throughout the State by increasing the awareness and use of environmentally responsible building practices, materials and site designs that provide comfortable, affordable and healthier buildings.
While many similar programs across the country focus solely on buildings, Maryland's program takes a holistic approach by also focusing on the impact of buildings on the landscape.
It is recognized that some elements of green building have more of an impact on controlling nonpoint source pollution than others.
For example, the Green Building Program promotes the use of environmentally sensitive site design, including low-impact development, and it is believed that these approaches directly aid in protecting watersheds.
On the other hand, building energy efficiency is typically not seen as a nonpoint source pollution technique.
However, water quality, and overall environmentally quality, would improve if the use of petroleum based fuel was dramatically reduced in lieu of renewable fuel sources.
Lakes
Introduction
While Maryland has no large, naturally-occurring lakes, there are many hundreds of reservoirs in the state created by stream or river impoundments and many lagoons or pools created by berm construction and mined pits or quarries.
Many of these lakes are open to the public for recreational uses such as fishing, swimming, and boating.
These water bodies often are overshadowed by the overwhelming commercial and recreational importance of the nearby Chesapeake Bay, but they are valuable and important water resources to the state and its citizens.
Compared to some other states, most of Maryland's lakes are relatively small (Table 3.6) and privately owned.
Yet, lakes with public access are located in almost every county, making recreational access to these waters a short trip from anywhere in the state.
Table 3.6 Summary of federal, public, and private lakes, ponds, and reservoirs in Maryland.
Lake Size Number of lakes Total acreage less than 10 acres 562 2,958.0 10 to 500 acres 370 15,662.0 greater than 500 acres 15 59,344.0 TOTAL 947 77,965.0
(Source: US Environmental Protection Agency, 1991)
Maryland's definition of "significant, publicly-owned lakes" does not include industrial or municipal waste treatment lagoons, stormwater management ponds, or "run-of-the-river" lakes in which impoundments are formed in a river behind relatively low dams.
Some quasi-public lakes are included because of their importance as public water supplies and recreational resources (e.g., Washington Suburban Sanitary Commission reservoirs).
Lakes and reservoirs on federal property are excluded since public access and use of these lakes often is restricted or prohibited.
Many lake managers or owners do not have control of the contributing watersheds.
Partnerships like those established for the Baltimore City reservoirs and the Patuxent Reservoirs are necessary to maintain lake water quality.
Lake Pollution Control Measures
Compared to streams and rivers, lakes are relatively still.
The minimal movement in the water allows suspended sediments (and associated metals, pesticides, and nutrients) to settle to the bottom.
The sediment covers aquatic habitat and reduces the lake volume.
Nutrients carried into the lake or released from the sediment are used by phytoplankton and higher aquatic plants.
An abundance of these nutrients can trigger algal blooms - an overabundance of phytoplankton.
The die off and degradation of the algae lowers dissolved oxygen levels and can cause fish kills and create taste and odor problems.
The natural "aging" or eutrophication process is accelerated by human activities, such as agriculture and urbanization, which increase the amount of sediment, nutrients, and toxic materials entering the lake.
Successful restoration and management programs can extend the life of the lake and provide abundant aquatic habitat and recreational opportunities.
Lake restoration techniques address the in-lake symptoms of eutrophication while control procedures or techniques focus on the sources of lake eutrophication.
Eutrophication control efforts reduce nutrient and sediment input to lakes from both point and nonpoint sources of pollution.
Nonpoint Source Controls
Nonpoint source runoff (urban/suburban, agricultural, and forest) accounts for much of the nutrient load entering impounded waters.
These nutrients (particularly phosphorus) are often associated with sediment.
Controlling sediment from these nonpoint sources, therefore, is critical for phosphorus load reduction.
Pollutant controls focus on structural devices and land treatments that intercept or reduce pollutant loadings and regulatory programs that mandate the use of best management practices (BMPs) on adjacent lands.
These control procedures are also used to reduce excessive levels of bacteria and toxic materials.
The controls include, but are not limited to: the use of wetlands and forest management programs around lakes and reservoirs to trap and reduce nutrients; the establishment of agricultural BMPs on farms; and the effective control of stormwater runoff from urban and suburban development.
Lake Restoration Programs
Restoration of impaired water bodies requires ecosystem rehabilitation techniques to restore the beneficial uses.
In Maryland, most lakes are not actively managed largely due to the lack of funds for a management program.
Some lake managers are using innovative management techniques and tools to control eutrophication in their lakes.
The methods used depend on the nature and severity of the problems.
Results from a survey of lake managers in 1993 identified several active lake management programs, including aquatic plant management (using herbicides, harvesting, and drawdowns), erosion control, implementation of BMPs in the lake watershed, installation of in-lake sediment traps, creation of fish habitat, and collection of debris.
About half of the lake managers reported having a water quality monitoring effort and about two-thirds of the managers had established goals.
Lake management programs and regulations, however, had been implemented in only about 40 percent of the lakes.
The current status of these programs is not known.
Clean Lakes (Section 314) Program
The Clean Lakes Program is a federal grant program established in 1972 as Section 314 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act to provide financial and technical assistance to states in restoring publicly-owned lakes.
The initial focus of the program was on research, development of lake restoration techniques, and the evaluation of lake conditions.
In 1980, Clean Lakes Program regulations (40 CFR 35 Subpart H) directed program managers to diagnose the current condition of lakes and their watersheds, determine the extent and sources of pollution, develop feasible lake restoration and protection plans (Phase I Diagnostic/Feasibility Studies), and implement these plans (Phase II Restoration/Protection Implementation Projects).
Since 1979, Maryland has received more than $2.4 million in Clean Lakes cost-share funds.
About one-tenth of these funds ($244,000) was used to support Phase I diagnostic studies, but most of the funds ($2,040,022) supported the more expensive Phase II restoration activities.
No Phase III post-restoration projects have been funded in Maryland.
In 1995, Congress rescinded funds for the Clean Lakes Program, effectively cutting off future funding through that section of the Clean Water Act.
Ongoing Clean Lakes projects were permitted to be completed; in Maryland, the last Clean Lakes grants were officially closed in December, 1996.
Following Congressional withdrawal of Clean Lakes funds in 1995, EPA issued new guidance for implementing state nonpoint source activities funded under Section 319.
Key aspects of the guidance include an allowance of the use of Section 319 funds to update state nonpoint source programs including a new section entitled "Lake Protection and Restoration Activities."
Clean Lakes Program Phase I, II, and III projects and lake water quality assessments are eligible for funding under Section 319 grants.
States are encouraged to fund "Clean Lakes" programs with Section 319 funds, although these funds cannot be used for in-lake work, such as aquatic macrophyte harvesting or dredging, unless the sources of pollution to the lake have already been addressed.
Maryland's Source Water Assessment Program
The 1996 Safe Drinking Water Act Amendments require that states develop and implement source water assessment programs to evaluate the safety of all public drinking water systems.
Source water assessments evaluate public drinking water supply vulnerability to contamination.
An assessment does not address the treatment processes, or the storage and distribution aspects of the water system.
MDE is the lead agency for administering the Source Water Assessment Program.
In 1999, after receiving significant input from a Technical Advisory Group (representing public water systems, various government agencies, industry associations, and the Potomac and Susquehanna River Commissions) and a Citizens Advisory Group (representing various environmental and political organizations, watershed protection groups, and health organizations) MDE submitted its final draft of the program to EPA.
EPA approved Maryland's Source Water Assessment Plan in November, 1999.
This plan will evaluate the safety of public drinking water sources.
Public drinking water systems are broken down into three major categories: community systems, nontransient noncommmunity systems, and transient noncommunity systems.
Community systems are water systems that serve 25 or more year-round residents, and include many small communities as well as large systems such as the Baltimore City Water System and the Washington Suburban Sanitary Commission.
Nontransient noncommunity systems serve 25 or more individuals each day who regularly use the water system for 6 months per year or more.
The nontransient noncommunity systems include such facilities as schools and places of employment that use their own wells.
The transient noncommunity systems serve 25 or more people daily, but not the same people every day.
Restaurants and campgrounds with their own wells are typical transient noncommunity water systems.
Domestic wells serving individual homes are not included in this program.
The plan uses three main tools for assessing drinking water sources: source water delineation, contaminant surveys, and susceptibility analysis.
The information gained through these tools will be used to explain the susceptibility of a water supply source to contaminants that may affect the safety of drinking water.
With this information, local governments and water suppliers in partnership with MDE and other agencies can develop water supply protection programs to improve the integrity of each water supply in the state.
Maryland plans to complete the assessment process by May 2003.
For source water assessment of ground water, MDE is building upon the work of its Monitoring Waiver Program and its Wellhead Protection Program.
The Monitoring Waiver Program established definitions and criteria for sources to be classified as confined aquifers and established procedures for reviewing potential contaminant sources within a fixed distance of wells.
The waiver program helped prioritize the sampling of Maryland's water systems for pesticide and organic chemical analysis.
Information on contaminant sources collected under the waiver program and associated monitoring will be instrumental for beginning the assessment process.
The Wellhead Protection Program has focused on community systems (1,000 or more people) using unconfined aquifers.
Wellhead protection areas have been delineated, potential sources of contamination have been identified and an assessment of the risk and management recommendations have been made for these systems.
Source water assessments for these systems will be completed by updating the wellhead protection studies with current sources, new land use maps and reviewing the most recent contaminant inventory and monitoring data described in the program document.
______________________________________________________________
Return to Table of Contents
The Chesapeake Bay Program partners include the State of Maryland; the Commonwealths of Pennsylvania and Virginia; the District of Columbia; the Chesapeake Bay Commission-a tri-state legislative body; the Environmental Protection Agency-representing the federal government; and participating advisory groups.
As the largest estuary in the United States and one of the most productive in the world, the Chesapeake was this nation's first estuary targeted for restoration and protection.
In the late 1970s, scientific and estuarine research on the bay pinpointed three areas requiring immediate attention: nutrient over enrichment, dwindling underwater bay grasses, and toxic pollution.
With completion of the initial research, the Chesapeake Bay Program evolved as the means to restore this exceptionally valuable resource.
Since its inception in 1983, the Bay Program's highest priority has been the restoration of the bay's living resources- its finfish, shellfish, submerged grasses, and other aquatic life and wildlife.
Improvements include fisheries and habitat restoration, recovery of bay grasses, nutrient and toxics reductions, and significant advances in estuarine science.
The Bay Program has initiated many actions including a watershed-wide phosphate detergent ban, the introduction of agricultural best management practices (BMPs), biological nutrient removal at wastewater plants, and a public education campaign emphasizing the role each of the watershed's 15 million residents play in the restoration.
Considered a national and international model for estuarine research and restoration programs, the Bay Program is a partnership led by the Chesapeake Executive Council.
The members of the Executive Council are the governors of Maryland, Virginia, and Pennsylvania; the mayor of the District of Columbia; the administrator of the EPA; and the chairman of the Chesapeake Bay Commission.
The Executive Council meets annually to establish the policy direction for the bay and its living resources.
In the 1987 Chesapeake Bay Agreement, the Executive Council set a goal to reduce the quantities of nitrogen and phosphorous entering the bay by 40 percent by the year 2000.
Achieving a 40 percent nutrient reduction will ultimately improve the dissolved oxygen levels in bay waters and encourage aquatic life to flourish.
In the 1992 amendments, the Bay Program partners agreed to maintain the 40 percent goal beyond the year 2000 and to attack nutrients at their source- in the bay's tributaries.
As a result, Pennsylvania, Maryland, Virginia, and the District of Columbia began developing tributary strategies to achieve the nutrient reduction targets.
The Bay Program also began reevaluating its Basinwide Toxics Reduction Strategy to better understand the impact that toxics have on the bay's resources.
In 1993, the Bay Program partners celebrated a "Decade of Progress" by highlighting the tenth anniversary of the signing of the 1983 Chesapeake Bay Agreement along with some of the restoration successes to date, including an increase in the coverage of underwater bay grasses and significant reductions of point source pollution.
Highlighting the results-oriented emphasis of the Bay Program, the Executive Council guided the restoration effort in 1993 with five directives addressing key areas of the restoration, including the tributaries, toxics, underwater bay grasses, fish passages, and agricultural nonpoint source pollution.
Specifically, the Executive Council directed the partners to outline initiatives for nutrient reduction in the bay's tributaries; revise the Basinwide Toxics Reduction Strategy by 1994; develop action plans to address problems related to toxics in specific geographic areas within the watershed; and work with the agricultural community to implement total resource management programs on farms in the watershed.
In addition, the Executive Council set an initial goal for recovery of bay grasses at 114,000 acres by the year 2005 and set five (582 miles) and ten-year (1,350 miles) goals for reopening upstream spawning habitat for migratory fish by removing blockages, such as small dams, on the bay's tributaries.
In July 1994, high-level federal officials from 25 agencies and departments signed the Agreement of Federal Agencies on Ecosystem Management in the Chesapeake Bay.
The historic agreement outlined specific goals and commitments by federal agencies on federal lands throughout the watershed, as well as new cooperative efforts by federal agencies elsewhere.
In October 1994, the Executive Council called the implementation of the tributary strategies the top priority for the bay and its rivers.
The Executive Council also adopted the 1994 Chesapeake Bay Basinwide Toxics Reduction and Prevention Strategy.
In addition, the Executive Council issued new initiatives for riparian forest buffers, habitat restoration, and reciprocal agricultural certification programs.
In 1995, the Executive Council initiated the Chesapeake Bay Partner Communities program.
The program, which is co-sponsored by the Susquehanna River Basin Commission and other agencies, encourages and supports local governments in the bay watershed that are committed to protecting water quality, the bay, and its many tributaries.
The goal is to broaden the role of local governments in the Chesapeake Bay Program to employ local solutions.
Communities will be selected for one of the three designations (bronze, silver, or gold) based on their accomplishments in the following categories: (1) development that works; (2) preventing pollution; (3) conserving and preserving living resources; (4) valuing trees and forests; (5) conserving the countryside/revitalizing communities; and (6) community participation.
The ultimate goal is to designate 20 percent of local governments by the year 2005, with a mid-range goal of achieving 10 percent designation by 2000.
In addition to the established forms of recognition, Bay Partner Communities, in some instances, will receive priority standing during the Chesapeake Bay Program's budget process.
The Executive Council followed this in 1996 by adopting the Local Government Participation Action Plan and the Priorities for Action for Land, Growth and Stewardship in the Chesapeake Bay Region, which address land use management, growth and development, stream corridor protection, and infrastructure improvements.
The Executive Council also signed the Riparian Forest Buffers Initiative in 1996, which increased the Bay Program's commitment to improve water quality and enhance habitat.
The new goal calls for restoring 2,010 miles of riparian buffers on streams and shorelines in the watershed by the year 2010.
In 1997, the Executive Council renewed its commitment to the 40 percent nutrient reduction goal, acknowledging that it had to accelerate efforts.
A Bay Program study had concluded that the goal for phosphorus reduction would be met by 2000, but the goal for nitrogen would not unless efforts intensified.
Other directives signed in 1997 focused on wetlands protection and restoration and the development of a Bay Program Community Watershed Initiative.
At the 1998 Executive Council Meeting, education, technology and a renewed Chesapeake Bay Agreement (Chesapeake 2000) were highlighted as the top tools for the future of the bay's restoration.
Council members also signed a directive to coordinate a regional effort to manage the use and transportation of animal waste.
Recent bay restoration highlights also include an analysis of 12 years of monitoring data, which show that the major rivers and the freshwater portions of the Bay are cleaner now than they were 12 years ago.
In 1998, water clarity was below average during the spring and early summer because record high flows delivered sediment runoff to the Bay and its tributaries.
In the late summer and fall, however, water clarity rebounded due to low river flows.
With lower quantities of suspended solids in the water, the water was less cloudy.
Other recent restoration highlights include: *
Bay underwater grasses: The total acreage of bay grasses has increased to more than 69,000 in the region.
The Bay Program's goal is to reach 114,000 acres in 2005.
Fish passage: Through 1998, completion of fish passage projects had opened a total of 635 miles of bay tributaries.
In 2003, the goal is for Bay Program partners to open 1,357 miles for migratory fish to reach spawning areas.
Pfiesteria: As of December 1998, Maryland, Virginia, and federal agencies had made more funds available for the research and monitoring of Pfiesteria which was linked to fish kills in 1997.
Exotic species: A species of snail- the Veined Rapa Whelk- was discovered in the summer of 1998 in the bay near Hampton Roads, Virginia.
Studies are being conducted to learn more about this native of the Sea of Japan.
Oyster habitat: As of December 1998, Maryland and Virginia had met or exceeded goals to designate 11,000 acres of bay bottom as aquatic reef habitat.
Forests: In 1998, the conservation organization American Forests partnered with the Bay Program and kicked off the Global ReLeaf for the Chesapeake campaign to plant one million trees in the bay region by 2000.
Chemical releases: The latest data confirm that industries showed a 67 percent reduction in toxic releases to the Bay between 1988 and 1996.
Pollution Prevention: A Bay Program survey of farmers found that Integrated Pest Management (IPM) is practiced on 61 percent of bay area cropland.
The Bay Program's goal is to have this pollution prevention technique practiced on 75 percent of bay region cropland by 2000.
Bay Partner Communities: The Chesapeake Bay Partner Communities Program recognized 16 communities that took significant steps in protecting local natural resources and the Chesapeake in 1998.
Businesses for the Bay: More than 222 million pounds of waste were either reduced or recycled in 1998 by members of Businesses for the Bay- the Bay Program's voluntary pollution prevention program for bay area businesses.
Land, growth and stewardship: The Bay Program funded three workshops in 1998 on sustainable development to provide a regional communication network for land and growth issues.
A watershed-wide summit called "Toward a Sustainable Chesapeake" was held March 22-23, 1999.
Science: The Bay Program's Scientific and Technical Advisory Committee has launched Chesapeake Futures- a team of experts looking at issues related to the Bay's possible health in the year 2030.
In December 1999, the Executive Council released the first public draft of the Chesapeake Bay 2000 agreement.
This draft agreement renews the Council's commitment to restoring the Bay and lays out a detailed program of restoration activities.
Environmental goals have been reassessed and new goals have been established for living resources, habitat protection, water quality restoration and protection, land use and environmental stewardship.
Maryland supports these draft goals and when they are finalized they will be incorporated, as appropriate, into the Nonpoint Source Management Program.
Chesapeake Bay Program Goals
The Chesapeake Bay Program is the unique regional partnership that's been directing and conducting the restoration of the Chesapeake Bay since the signing of the historic 1983 Chesapeake Bay Agreement.
The following table defines the Chesapeake Bay Program Goals which are broken down by goal category: source reductions; resource goal; administrative/program goal; and stressor/ambient condition goal.
Many directives, adoptions statements, and agreements were signed over the years by the Chesapeake Bay Program signatories that lay out these environmental goals.
Table 3.1: Chesapeake Bay Short- and Long Term Goals
Goal Category Commitment Commitment Due Date Source of Goal Source Reduction 40% Nutrient Reduction - Total Nitrogen to Meet 2000 Goal - 229.9 Million Pound Cap 12/31/00 1987 Chesapeake Bay Agreement Source Reduction 40% Nutrient Reduction - Total Phosphorus Reduction to Meet 2000 Goal - 15.44 Million Pound Gap 12/31/00 1987 Chesapeake Bay Agreement Source Reduction Tributary Strategy Reductions - Potomac River Nitrogen Reduction Goal - 50.0 Million Pound Cap Phosphorus Reduction Goal - 3.61 Million Pound Cap 12/31/00 Chesapeake Bay Agreement 1992 Amendment Source Reduction Tributary Strategy Reduction - Patuxent River Nitrogen Reduction Goal - 3.5 Million Pound Cap Phosphorus Reduction Goal - 0.33 Million Pound Cap 12/31/00 Chesapeake Bay Agreement 1992 Amendment Source Reduction Tributary Strategy Reduction - Western Shore, Md Nitrogen Reduction Goal - 18.9 Million Pound Cap Phosphorus Reduction Goal - 1.22 Million Pound Cap 12/31/00 Chesapeake Bay Agreement 1992 Amendment Source Reduction Tributary Strategy Reduction - Eastern Shore, Md Nitrogen Reduction Goal - 14.1 Million Pound Cap Phosphorus Reduction Goal - 0.31 Million Pound Cap 12/31/00 Chesapeake Bay Agreement 1992 Amendment Resource Goal Interim SAV Restoration Goal - 114,000 Acres Baywide 12/31/05 Directive 93-3 Resource Goal Fish Passage -Ten Year Target of 1356.7 Miles 12/31/03 Directive 93-4 Resource Goal Fish Passage - Five Year Target of 582.05 Miles 12/31/98 Directive93-4 Resource Goal Waterfowl Targets - Restore Waterfowl Population and Habitat to 1970 Levels 12/31/00 Chesapeake Bay Waterfowl Policy and Management Plan 1990 Resource Goal Aquatic Reef Restoration - Restore 5,000 Acres in MD 
Program Goal Increase the Adoption of IPM in the Watershed Consistent with Administration's Goal- IPM on 75% of Us Agricultural Land 01/01/00 Chesapeake Bay Basinwide Toxics Reduction and Prevention Strategy 1994 Source Reduction Achieve 75% Voluntary Reduction of Toxic Releases for Federal Facilities in the Watershed 12/31/00 Chesapeake Bay Basinwide Toxics Reduction and Prevention Strategy 1994 Administrative/ Program Goal Achieve 75% Voluntary Participation of Industrial Facilities, Commercial Establishments, and Small Businesses in Pollution Prevention Programs 12/31/00 Chesapeake Bay Basinwide Toxics Reduction and Prevention Strategy 1994 Administrative/
Program Goal Establish Volunteer IPM Practices on 75% of All Agricultural, Recreational, and Public Lands 12/31/00 Chesapeake Bay Basinwide Toxics Reduction and Prevention Strategy 1994 Stressor/ambient Condition Goal Eliminate All Acute and Chronic Toxic Effects from Discharges under the NPDES ( Water Permit) Program 12/31/05 Chesapeake Bay Basinwide Toxics Reduction and Prevention Strategy 1994 Source Reduction Achieve 75% Voluntary Reduction in Chesapeake Bay Toxics of Concern Chemicals Industries in the Watershed from a 1988 Baseline.
12/31/00 Chesapeake Bay Basinwide Toxics Reduction and Prevention Strategy 1994 Source Reduction Achieve 65% Voluntary Reduction in Toxics Release Inventory Chemicals from Watershed Industries from a 1998 Baseline 12/31/00 Chesapeake Bay Basinwide Toxics Reduction and Prevention Strategy 1994 Administrative/ Program Goals Achieve 100% Participation by All State and Local Governments In the Watershed in the Implementation of Pollution Prevention Programs 12/31/00 Chesapeake Bay Basinwide Toxics Reduction and Prevention Strategy 1994 Resource Goal Restore Riparian Forests on 2,010 Miles of Stream and Shoreline in the Watershed, Targeting Efforts Where They Will Be of Greatest Value to Water Quality and Living Resources 12/31/10 Adoption Statement on Riparian Forest Buffers 1996
Tributary Strategy Program
In 1983, the State of Maryland, the commonwealths of Pennsylvania and Virginia, the District of Columbia, the Chesapeake Bay Commission, and the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency joined in a partnership to restore the Chesapeake Bay.
Leaders of these jurisdictions recognized that the bay's problems could not be solved by any one of them acting alone.
In 1987, they signed the Chesapeake Bay Agreement to remedy the most pervasive pollution problem by cooperating on a 40 percent reduction of nutrients entering the bay by the year 2000.
In 1992, they acknowledged that the bay was in decline not only because of changes in the bay but also due to changes in the watershed as a whole.
Consequently, they amended the agreement to require tributary-specific plans for nutrient reduction in the bay's major tributaries.
The Tributary Strategies represent a comprehensive approach to nutrient pollution reduction in Maryland's watersheds.
State and local government representatives, along with the citizens living and working in the watersheds, developed these strategies.
To achieve the 40 percent nutrient reduction mandate for the state, Maryland's Chesapeake Bay basin has been divided into ten major tributary watersheds including three subwatersheds for the Maryland portion of the Potomac River.
Each of these tributaries has a specific nutrient reduction goal.
When all the tributary reductions are realized, Maryland will have achieved its overall reduction goal.
This regional focus allows the state and local governments to work with the public to build a locally-based framework to protect and restore the rivers and streams of the Chesapeake Bay watershed.
In Maryland, major cleanup activities are now underway in ten key bay tributaries under the guidance of the tributary teams.
These tributaries are the Upper Western Shore, Lower Western Shore, Upper Eastern Shore, Choptank, Lower Eastern Shore, Patapsco/Back, Patuxent, Upper Potomac, Middle Potomac, and Lower Potomac (figure 3.1).
Using a watershed approach to pollution control, the teams are tackling the nutrients that find their way into the streams and rivers from widely scattered land sources.
Excess fertilizer from farm fields and suburban lawns, sewage from old septic systems, and sediment from construction projects can wash off the land and into waterways with each rainfall.
Pollution from backyards and driveways can find its way into waterways through the neighborhood's network of storm drains.
Maryland's Tributary Teams meet regularly to help implement pollution prevention and restoration measures that address local water quality problems.
These teams are laying the groundwork to ensure clean water and healthy rivers for future generations.
A major focus of their efforts is controlling nutrient pollution from farm fields and horse pastures, wastewater treatment plants, construction and road building, and hundreds of thousands of suburban properties.
The tracking of the level of nutrient loading reduction practices are located in Appendix 4.
Figure 3.1:Maryland's 10 Tributary Basins
map of Maryland 10 Trib basins Developing a pollution control plan unique to each watershed, its population, and land use is a major task.
The pollution control options being implemented in each tributary basin include upgrades to wastewater treatment plants, the planting of streamside forests to absorb nutrient runoff, best management practices to reduce agricultural runoff, and "smart growth" plans that concentrate new development and protect open spaces and natural habitat.
This coordinated watershed-by-watershed approach brings the bay cleanup closer to home for the many citizens, businesses, and local governments working to protect local waterways and the Chesapeake Bay.
The Tributary Team's Annual Report includes updated tracking information about best management practices implementation as well as statewide and tributary basin nutrient load reductions.
Maryland's Tributary Teams have made many valuable contributions to the state's nutrient reduction efforts through policy recommendations, demonstration projects, and community education.
Tributary team accomplishments include: * developing and publishing a 36 page booklet in the Baltimore Sun.
This booklet contained information on how individuals can take action to help protect their local watersheds and the Bay.
* creating, with the Baltimore Sun, a "bay friendly" Garden Calendar for homeowners.
* holding workshops for landowners on the benefits of riparian forest buffers and promoting the Stream ReLeaf and Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (see chapter five for a complete description of CREP).
Team members have also participated and coordinated riparian buffer planting projects.
* holding workshops on financing for stormwater management and urban infrastructure, on designs and practices that reduce nutrient pollution from construction, lawn care and maintenance, and on smart growth issues.
* creating a cover crop task force to recommend policies to encourage greater adoption of cover crops.
* participation in habitat restoration and watershed restoration projects; and * meeting with local elected officials throughout the state to brief them on Tributary Strategies, Tributary Team activities and seek their support for nutrient reduction efforts.
Nearing the year 2000, the teams are faced with a new set of challenges: * Additional nutrient reduction - The latest scientific studies indicate that the amounts of nitrogen and phosphorus entering the bay are higher than previously assessed.
Additional actions are needed to reduce nutrients to levels that allow bay grasses, fish, crabs, and other creatures to thrive.
* Growth - To successfully establish and incorporate "cap" nutrient loads, the state will need to continue to come up with innovative ways of managing growth.
* Expanding the watershed approach - The teams recognize that nutrient reduction efforts can be combined with habitat restoration and drinking water protection to produce a broader watershed restoration action plan.
Local communities are critical partners in such efforts.
* Continued involvement in local governments - Local governments have played a critical role in the bay cleanup to date.
Their role will become even more important with the challenges of growth and the use of innovative approaches to restore local watersheds.
* A new bay agreement - To meet the challenges listed above, the Chesapeake Bay Program is drafting a new Chesapeake Bay Agreement to be signed in 2000.
Tributary Teams have been asked to help assess the public's perspective, determine how various stakeholder groups view a renewed Bay Agreement, as well as express their own comprehensive point of view.
Maryland's Targeted Watersheds
Introduction
Many of Maryland's watersheds have been or are currently being degraded by increased urbanization, industrialization, and agricultural practices.
The cumulative effects of these practices can adversely impact the biological, chemical, and physical components of the aquatic environment, making it unsuitable for living resources.
To combat these problems, Maryland initiated the Targeted Watershed Project.
The Targeted Watershed Project's objective was to demonstrate that improvements in water quality and habitat conditions can be achieved by coordinating the monitoring, pollution control, and restoration programs of public and private organizations.
In 1989, four watersheds were targeted because they were threatened by multiple sources of degradation from urbanization or contributed disproportionately high levels of nutrients to the Chesapeake Bay from agricultural nonpoint sources.
The four targeted watersheds are: 1) Sawmill Creek, 2) Bird River, 3) German Branch, and 4) Piney/Alloway Creek.
The Sawmill Creek and Bird River watersheds are located in urban areas with plans for increasing development.
The German Branch and Piney/Alloway Creek watersheds are located in predominately agricultural regions of the state.
The four selected watersheds range in size from 8,000 to 30,000 acres.
Water quality improvements due to best management practices (BMPs) and other restoration activities should be easier to track in watersheds of this size.
The Nonpoint Source Program has funded several projects in all four targeted watersheds.
After identifying the four watersheds, the work group recruited two types of interagency teams.
The first group was an overall monitoring team which worked in all four watersheds.
The monitoring team was comprised primarily of scientists, managers, and technical staff with experience in physical, chemical, and biological field assessment methods.
The second group consisted of four implementation teams - one for each watershed.
Each implementation team included planners, land managers, scientists, and regulators who were responsible for or knowledgeable about the specific watershed.
Program
DNR's Watershed Restoration Division has been involved in assessing watershed conditions and implementing restoration projects in the four targeted watersheds for over seven years.
Monitoring was used to establish baseline conditions within the watersheds and to evaluate the effectiveness of BMPs.
A variety of standard sampling methods have been used over the years.
These include water chemistry and hydrologic investigations, as well as modified versions of EPA's Rapid Bioassessment Protocols for fish, macro-invertebrates and habitat.
Although these methods provide detailed information on a suite of environmental parameters, the intensity of the monitoring efforts limits the number of sites which can be sampled in a given watershed.
In order to provide a more complete overview of a watershed's resources and problems the Watershed Restoration Division has developed additional screening tools in order to increase the ability to target and evaluate the benefits of selected BMPs.
Tools
The Stream Corridor Assessment Methodology was developed to identify potential restoration sites and target restoration activities.
The adaptation of the methodology to Sawmill Creek provided resource managers with the means to direct management activities in this creek.
The Stream Corridor Assessment Methodology involves walking the entire stream corridor within a watershed and documenting the physical problems and restoration opportunities.
The use of synoptic surveys of both nutrients and toxics were added to isolate source areas more precisely and prioritize restoration projects.
Both of these methods have become standard screening tools in identifying and prioritizing watershed problems and restoration opportunities; they should help guide future monitoring efforts into areas where cause and effect may be most easily established.
After an environmental baseline for a watershed has been established and the restoration activities area is targeted, the emphasis of the monitoring efforts shifts to tracking and evaluation of restoration activities.
The Bird River project was the first Targeted Watershed Project to refine its scope and focus on the effects of BMPs.
By reducing the scope of monitoring activities within the watershed, the Division could refocus them above and below the stream channel restoration projects on White Marsh Run.
Since that time, monitoring activities in each of the other watersheds have also been targeted to evaluate projects in the sub-watersheds where monitoring activities are more likely to establish cause-and-effect relationships.
The monitoring and evaluation that the Watershed Restoration Division conducts in the future will be part of a comprehensive watershed management planning process and will create specific products for users within a watershed.
The suite of assessment tools can be used in different combinations to address the needs and wishes of partners within a given watershed.
Maryland Coastal Bays Program
Also known as the "back bays" due to their location behind Ocean City and Assateague Island, Maryland's coastal bays include the Isle of Wight, Assawoman, Sinepuxent, Newport and Chincoteague bays as well as other smaller bays and estuaries within the watershed.
These bays are estuaries--bodies of water where fresh and salt water mix-and are important environmental, recreational, and economic resources.
Maryland's coastal bays encompass approximately 112,000 acres.
To the east, Maryland's coastal bays are bounded by Ocean City and Assateague Island and by Worcester County to the west.
The coastal bays extend north into Delaware and south into Virginia.
Also included within the coastal bay watershed are 23 tributary rivers and creeks that flow into the bays, including the St. Martin River, Turville Creek and Trappe Creek.
Maryland has management responsibility for the part of the coastal bay watershed located within the state's boundaries.
What is Maryland's Coastal Bay Program?
The Maryland Coastal Bays Program (MCBP) has been a three-year planning effort that began with a scientific assessment of the coastal bays' conditions and trends.
This led to the development of a Comprehensive Conservation and Management Plan (CCMP) that addresses the bays' environmental restoration and protection needs, and has evolved into an integrated effort to implement restoration and protection efforts.
This collaborative effort is a partnership of federal, state and local governments, citizens, environmental organizations, businesses, agricultural interest, and scientists.
The CCMP is founded on consensus with input from all those having a stake in the plan's recommendations and programs.
Figure 3.2: Coastal Bays Region
map of Maryland's coastal bay region The MCBP is part of the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency's National Estuary Program (NEP).
Currently, 28 NEP's exist across the country.
The model for these programs is based on the pioneering work done on the Chesapeake Bay.
On October 13, 1999 the CCMP was approved by the EPA.
The CCMP identified five primary problems in the coastal bays: degraded water quality, chemical contamination, loss of habitats, changes in living resources and unsustainable growth and development.
The CCMP contains four Action Plans [Water Quality, Fish and Wildlife, Recreation and Navigation and Community and Economic Development ] to address these primary problems.
Each action plan pinpoints specific conservation actions needed to address the environmental problems mentioned above.
It also depicts funding shortfalls, who will be responsible for implementing it, and a timetable for the implementation of each strategy.
* The Water Quality section examine ways to decrease nutrient, sediment, and chemical loadings from atmospheric and terrestrial sources through septic system maintenance, stormwater design, natural shoreline preservation, and a host of other best management practices, economic incentives and educational initiatives.
Programs being developed and implemented include: providing incentives for state of the art septic systems to be built with new homes; implementation of local "Master Gardener" program; modifying stormwater management designs to reduce nutrient-rich surface water interaction with groundwater; improving farming efficiency through cost-sharing, and demonstration projects that reduce nutrient, chemical and sediment input; encourage wastewater reuse and sludge application where appropriate; upgrading sewage pumpout and oil recycling facilities; DNR Clean Marina assistance; and incentives for new landowners to establish vegetated buffers.
* The Fish and Wildlife section focuses on the protection of fish, shellfish, songbirds, wetlands, endangered species, and other wildlife populations by establishing sustainable harvest measures, forest and habitat management strategies, and reducing invasive species.
The management plan for the coastal bays tackles a host of resource management issues in the watershed.
Although the plan pinpoints specific management goals for fish, bird, and shellfish species, other living resources, such as amphibians, will benefit from strategies that protect critical habitat.
* The Community and Economic Development section strives to preserve the character of the region by providing the tools through which the public can make wise decisions about growth-related issues and by protecting farms and natural lands through incentives and policy improvements.
* The Recreation and Navigation section will improve navigation, marina, and dredging management by developing a long-term master plan to guide navigation and dredging along with guidelines for the location and design of new marinas.
Policies to improve public access, protect sensitive aquatic resources, and reduce water usage conflicts and boating hazards are also planned.
The tables below describes the major goals contained in the four action plans.
Additional information is contained in "Today's Treasures for Tomorrow: Towards a Brighter Future - A Comprehensive Conservation and Management Plan for Maryland's Coastal Bays" June 1999.
Table 3.2 Water Quality - Goals and Actions
GOAL 1: Decreased nutrient inputs to groundwater from residential and commercial land uses.
Actions WQ1.1 Reduce failure rate and inefficiency of on site wastewater treatment WQ1.2 Update septic system designs WQ1.3 Improve understanding of groundwater resource WQ1.4 Reduce excessive fertilization by turf professionals WQ1.5 Reduce excessive fertilization by homeowners
GOAL 2: Decrease nutrient inputs from stormwater runoff.
Actions WQ2.1 Reduce water quality impacts from stormwater discharges WQ2.2 Improve stormwater quality from existing development WQ2.3 Reduce groundwater contamination from roadside ditches WQ2.4 Improve coordination of stormwater and septic systems
GOAL 3: Decrease nutrient inputs from the atmosphere.
Actions WQ3.1 Improve understanding of atmospheric deposition
GOAL 4: Decrease nutrient inputs from agricultural sources.
Actions WQ4.1 Reduce nutrient pollution from farming WQ4.2 Improve efficiency of fertilizer application rates WQ4.3 Improve management of drainage systems
GOAL 5: Reduce nutrient inputs from point sources.
Actions WQ5.1 More reuse of wastewater WQ5.2 Increase tertiary sewage treatment
GOAL 6: Improve water clarity by reducing sediment inputs.
Actions WQ6.1 Improve efficiency of sediment and erosion control program WQ6.2 Reduce shoreline erosion rates
GOAL 7: Decrease inputs of chemical contaminants.
Actions WQ7.1 Reduce runoff of toxic chemicals WQ7.2 Better management of household and farm hazardous waste
Table 3.3: Fish and Wildlife - Goals and Actions
Goal 1: Increase fish and shellfish species.
Actions FW1.1 Obtain more accurate harvest information FW1.2 Develop techniques to sustain fishery populations FW1.3 Prepare a hard clam fishery management plan for the coastal bays FW1.4 Develop a crab management plan for the coastal bays and continue research on crab parasite.
FW1.5 Investigate stock management practices, along with habitat improvement (especially flounder) and associated educational opportunities FW1.6 Promote and enhance the natural recovery of seagrass beds FW1.7 Improve water quality in dead-end canals.
FW1.8 Reduce trash in the coastal bays FW1.9 Protect and enhance natural shoreline habitats
Goal 2: Enhance forest habitats to protect songbirds, other wildlife populations and aquatic resources.
Actions FW2.1 Determine the distribution and composition of forested habitat for neotropical and migrating birds FW2.2 Conserve forest resources FW2.3 Promote forest diversification FW2.4 Increase use of backyard habitats FW2.5 Increase use of agricultural habitats FW2.6 Reduce conversion of forests to other land uses
Goal 3: Protect and enhance wetlands to benefit water quality, aquatic resources, waterfowl and other wildlife.
Actions FW3.1 Protect existing wetlands and increase the amount of wetlands by 10,000 acres FW3.2 Identify and protect staging, flyway stopovers, nesting areas, and other critical habitats for bird populations FW3.3 Protect existing wetlands and encourage effective private wetland mitigation FW3.4 Better coordinate wetlands regulation FW3.5 Reduce any undesirable impacts of mosquito ditching in marsh lands
Goal 4: Protect threatened and endangered species.
Actions FW4.1 Reduce loss of threatened and endangered species habitat FW4.2 Better coordination of species protection efforts FW4.3 Reintroduce more threatened and endangered species
GOAL 5: Limit impacts to native plants and animals from non-native and nuisance species.
Actions FW5.1 Control invasive/exotic species FW5.2 Reduce impacts to native plants and animal habitats from "nuisance"species
Table 3.4 Recreation and Navigation - Goals and Actions
GOAL 1: Reduce the amount of sand and sediment entering the coastal bays from the inlet.
Actions RN1.1 Reduce unnatural sedimentation due to Ocean City Inlet
GOAL 2: Improve the management of navigation and dredging in the coastal bays.
Actions RN2.1 Improve coordination of navigation and dredging in coastal bays RN2.2 Enhance public awareness of navigation/dredging issues
GOAL 3: Balance resource protection with recreational use.
Actions RN3.1 Identify sensitive resources and incompatible recreational activities
GOAL 4: Improve boating safety in the coastal bays.
Actions RN4.1 Address safety problems associated with Ocean City Inlet and Route 50 bridge.
RN4.2 Address recurring conflicts among recreational users of water resources RN4.3 Enhance public awareness of boating rules and regulations RN4.4 Develop more enforcement capacity to protect sensitive resources and enhance boating safety
GOAL 5: Improve water-based recreational opportunities and diversity of access to coastal bays and tributaries.
Actions RN5.1 Enhance sustainable recreational use and public access RN5.2 Produce "guide to the coastal bays" to improve recreational activities and protect natural resources
GOAL 6: Create guidelines for locating new facilities.
Actions RN6.1 Reduce environmental impacts associated with new marinas
GOAL 7: Implement sustainable management practices at harbors and marinas.
Actions RN7.1 Increase use of best management practices and pollution control infrastructure at harbors and marinas RN7.2 Reduce resource damage from oil and hazardous material spills
Table 3.5 Community and Economic Development - Goals and Actions
GOAL 1: Educate and inform the population so it can make knowledgeable decisions about what it wants for its community and future.
Actions CE1.1 Increase public participation in planning decisions CE1.2 Provide planning tools to local decision makers to facilitate CCMP implementation
GOAL 2: Foster a community consensus on the desired future condition of the Maryland coastal bays region and a vision of how to promote the county as a vacation destination, farming region, resource protection area, and retirement community, while protecting and preserving the coastal bays.
Actions CE2.1 Promote the culture and character of the region CE2.2 Educate citizens about growth scenarios for future of watershed CE2.3 Protect localities from coastal hazards and minimize economic loss
GOAL 3: Manage the watershed to maximize economic benefits while minimizing negative resource impacts.
Actions CE3.1 Plan for impacts of tourists CE3.2 CE3.2 Reduce the loss of farmland and forest land CE3.3 Enhance or strengthen a diversified and sustainable economic base CE3.4 Promote water conservation CE3.5 Promote residential and business energy conservation
GOAL 4: Enhance the level of sustainability in land use decision making.
Actions CE4.1 Ensure growth is compatible with existing or planned services CE4.2 Provide incentives for developers to encourage and include natural resource preservation and restoration CE4.3 Improve buffers on tidal shoreline CE 4.4 Establish protections for non-tidal shorelines CE 4.5 Improve efficiency of transportation systems CE4.6 Assure that enforcement of environmental protection activities is consistent and predictable CE4.7 Enhance coordination between Maryland, Virginia, and Delaware,
The CCMP also contains a description of the organizational structure that implements the actions designed to protect the natural resources of the costal bays watershed.
o A Policy Committee of high level EPA, state, and local officials and citizen representatives establishes policies and priorities for the protection of the coastal bays and serves as an advocate for the implementation of the CCMP.
The policy committee provides broad policy direction, approves CCMP changes and seeks and develops funding sources to carry out the CCMP.
o The Coastal Bays Foundation is the non-profit organization responsible for administration of the Maryland Coastal Bays Program.
Coastal Bays Foundation board members include state and local officials, members of the fund-raining committee and the chair of the citizen advisory committee.
The foundation will be the grant recipient for the MCBP, guide development of the annual work plan and obtain and act as a clearinghouse for funding sources.
o A Fund-raising Committee comprised of interested citizens solicits private funds to support implementation activities outlined in the CCMP.
Committee members work with area businesses and individuals to develop support for program initiatives.
o An Implementation Committee of federal, state and local officials coordinates implementation activities, identifies and develops remedies to implementation barriers, develops implementation tracking reports and recommends implementation priorities and CCMP changes to the Policy Committee.
o The Citizens Advisory Committee (CAC) ensures that the public is involved during implementation of the CCMP.
The CAC recommends changes to the CCMP through continual planning exercises and ensures that public involvement and education are a central component of the program.
The membership of CAC includes representatives from a broad spectrum of citizen groups, business, industry, agriculture, and environmental organizations.
o The Scientific and Technical Advisory Committee (STAC) provides peer review and impartial scientific analysis for CCMP implementation.
The STAC carries out the Eutrophication Monitoring Plan in coordination with DNR, will complete the Coastal Bays Comprehensive Monitoring Plan, coordinates and implements research and monitoring in the coastal bays and provides technical support for CCMP implementation activities.
Anacostia River Initiative
Introduction
The Anacostia River watershed is located in the metropolitan Washington, DC area.
It is heavily urbanized with over 600,000 residents.
The Anacostia River watershed includes stakeholders from diverse socio-economic background, and every form of urban and suburban land use.
Over the past three centuries, the landscape of the Anacostia watershed has been greatly transformed by successive waves of cultivation and urbanization.
As a result of urban and suburban development in the late 19th and 20th centuries, the watershed underwent extensive change.
Sediment deposition from agricultural fields was augmented by runoff from construction zones and impervious surfaces.
Urbanization also brought increased flooding, further forest clearing and an influx of pollutants and toxins into the waters of the Anacostia.
The sewage inputs to the tidal river added organic wastes, bacteria and debris to the deteriorating waters of the Anacostia.
Figure 3.3: Anacostia River Watershed
map of Anacostia River Watershed The Anacostia estuary has some of the poorest water quality recorded in the Chesapeake Bay system.
It has a number of serious problems which have contributed to its degraded ecology and poor water quality: it is rapidly filling with sediment and debris from upstream; dissolved oxygen levels frequently violate water-quality standards; sediments are enriched with toxicants, hydorcarbons, trace metals and nutrients; many miles of stream habitats have been severely degraded by urbanization, which has profoundly altered the flow, shape, water quality, and ecology of these streams; anadromous fish migration has been blocked by numerous man-made fish barriers; over 98 percent of the tidal wetlands and nearly 75 percent of the freshwater wetlands within the watershed have been destroyed; and nearly 50 percent of the forest cover in the basin has been lost to urbanization, including much of the riparian vegetation.
In 1984, an agreement between the State of Maryland and the District of Columbia officially recognized the need for restoration of the Anacostia River watershed.
An intergovernmental partnership was created by the 1987 Anacostia Watershed Restoration Agreement, signed by the District of Columbia, Montgomery County, Prince George's County, and the State of Maryland.
The Agreement formalized a cooperative partnership to restore the Anacostia River and its tributaries.
To guide the restoration process, the Agreement called for the formation of an Anacostia Watershed Restoration Committee to develop a restoration plan.
Membership on the committee is broadly based and an aggressive outreach program has extended participation in the development and implementation of the restoration plan to over 60 public and private organizations.
In 1991, the partnership adopted, through its "Six-Point Action Plan," six broad-sweeping goals designed to restore the Anacostia River and its tributaries.
These goals were: dramatically reduce pollutant loads delivered to the tidal river so as to measurably improve water quality conditions by the turn of the century; restore and protect the ecological integrity of degraded urban Anacostia streams to enhance aquatic diversity and encourage a quality urban fishery; restore the spawning range of anadromous fish to historical limits; increase the natural filtering capacity of the watershed by sharply increasing the acreage and quality of tidal and non-tidal wetlands; expand the forest cover throughout the watershed and create a contiguous corridor of forest along the margins of its streams and rivers; and, make the public aware of their role in the Anacostia cleanup and increase their participation in restoration activities.
In July 1994, the Agreement of Federal Agencies on Ecosystem Management in the Chesapeake Bay (developed by the Chesapeake Bay Program of the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency) was signed by 23 federal agencies and departments.
A line item in that document pledged the signers' full support of a federal workplan to clean up the Anacostia in cooperation with the Anacostia Watershed Restoration Committee.
In September 1994, the Environmental Protection Agency, Region III, introduced its Anacostia Ecosystem Initiative.
The four main features of the Initiative are: watershed restoration; multi-media risk reduction; environmental justice; and public education and involvement.
In May 1996, the EPA Region III Administrator and the Chairman of the Anacostia Watershed Restoration Committee signed a Memorandum of Understanding.
The two parties to the Agreement pledged to cooperate in continuing the restoration of the Anacostia River and in providing diligent outreach and environmental services to the river's bordering communities.
As a result of the agreement, EPA Region III became a non-voting member of the Anacostia Watershed Restoration Committee.
The Metropolitan Washington Council of Governments is responsible for providing administrative and technical support to facilitate the restoration activities of the Anacostia Watershed Restoration Committee.
The Interstate Commission on the Potomac River is charged with coordinating and implementing public education and participation in the restoration effort and developing a living resource program for the watershed.
Since 1987, over $100 million dollars have been spent restoring the Anacostia watershed.
Progress has been made in each of the broad goals designated in the 1991 agreement.
Restoration activities have included:
o Over 60 stormwater retrofit projects have been constructed or are in a planning or design phase.
Over 200 stormwater retrofits have been proposed.
In 1997, a $20 million dollar rehabilitation and replacement of aging trunk sewer lines in both Sligo Creek (Montgomery County) and Lower Beaverdam Creek (Prince George's County) was completed.
o An innovative swirl concentrator facility has been installed by the DC Department of Public Works and the US EPA to reduce the combined sewer/stormwater overflow from the Northeast Boundary Interceptor which services the largest combined sewer system drainage area in the Anacostia.
Since becoming fully operational in 1990, it is estimated that the swirl concentrator has reduced both floatable material and total phosphorus discharges from this combined sewer system by approximately 25 to 30 percent.
o Beginning in 1992, the D.C.
Department of Public Works (DC DPW), the Prince George's County Department of Environmental Resources, the Prince George's County Maryland-National Capital Park and Planning Commission (M-NCPPC) and the Interstate Commission on the Potomac River Basin (ICPRB) developed floating trash management initiatives for the river and its larger tributaries.
In 1993, DC DPW began using a small fleet of skimmer boats to remove trash and debris from the river.
M-NCPPC, with assistance from the ICPRB and local volunteers, operated intermittently between 1993 and 1995, a trash boom upstream of the Bladensburg Marina to test the trapping efficacy of this technique.
Over eight tons of floating debris were removed during the six-month-long trial period
o The Montgomery County Department of Environmental Protection, the Maryland Department of the Environment, the Metropolitan Washington Council of Governments, the US Army Corps of Engineers and Prince George's County Department of Environmental Resources have completed eight major stream restoration projects.
Six miles of degraded habitat in Sligo Creek, Brier Ditch, Northwest Branch and Northeast Branch have been rehabilitated for fish and other aquatic life.
Native fish were reintroduced into a restored portion of Sligo Creek.
o The restoration of 32 acres of tidal wetland and the creation of approximately 100 acres of non- tidal wetland, acquisition of over 300 acres of stream valley parkland for the protection of sensitive aquatic resources and riparian buffer reforestation of nearly 10 linear stream miles.
o Establishment of Anacostia fish blockage removal/modification priorities.
The Maryland Department of Natural Resources has identified more than 25 major Anacostia fish blockages.
o A watershed wide Anacostia River Cleanup Day which resulted in the collection of 30 tons of trash and debris.
o The implementation of nearly 27 Small Habitat Improvement restoration projects.
Nearly 600 watershed restoration projects have been identified and about 30% have been completed or are in progress.
o An Anacostia Watershed Citizen Advisory Committee has been establish to strengthen links between the Anacostia Watershed Restoration Committee and watershed residents.
In May 1999, interim goals and targets were set for the 1999 - 2000 period.
These goals slightly modified the 1991 six point action goals.
Goals and targets included:
o reducing stormwater related impacts through the control of runoff by stormwater retrofitting 400 additional acres of existing developed area within the watershed by the year 2000.
o developing a comprehensive trash and flotables reduction strategy for the river and its tributaries, which includes an actual demonstration of a promising trash reduction system(s) by the year 2000;
o protect ecologically sensitive headwater tributaries and targeted stream reaches within the watershed through the use of zoning and master planning tools and techniques, stream valley park acquisition, special protection area designations, and other appropriate watershed management approaches;
o complete a watershed-wide inventory of existing fish barriers by the end of 1999; develop an action plan for the modification or removal of designated key blockages by the year 2000;
o permit no additional net loss of existing non-tidal or tidal wetland acreage within the watershed; restore and/or create an additional 41acres of tidal wetland by the year 2000;
o expand watershed monitoring efforts to include wetland areas and their associated wildlife;
o develop a watershed-wide green infrastructure which integrates both passive recreation with the protection of open space areas, including remaining large stands of forest, by the year 2000;
o continue to support and expand the exposure and participation of the watershed's citizenry in the restoration effort through the Anacostia Watershed Citizen's Advisory Committee;
o in cooperation with the Anacostia River Business Coalition (ARBC), continue to pursue restoration support and implementation opportunities with the private sector; and
o continue implementation of a basin-wide strategy to equitably achieve the six fundamental goals and associated targets by the year 2010.
Susquehanna River Basin Commission
River Background
The Susquehanna River is the nation's sixteenth largest river and is the largest river lying entirely in the United States that flows into the Atlantic Ocean.
The Susquehanna and its hundreds of tributaries drain 27,510 square miles, an area nearly the size of South Carolina, spread over parts of the states of New York, Pennsylvania, and Maryland.
The river meanders 444 miles from its origin at Otsego Lake near Cooperstown, N.Y., until it empties into the Chesapeake Bay at Havre de Grace, Md.
The Susquehanna contributes one-half of the freshwater flow to the Bay.
The river basin borders the major population centers of the east coast, and although relatively undeveloped, has experienced problems of water pollution and over usage.
Because the Susquehanna River flows through three states and is classified as a navigable waterway by the federal government, there are state, regional, and national interests involved.
There is a need to coordinate the efforts of three states and the agencies of the federal government, as well as a need to establish a management system to oversee the use of the water and related natural resources of the Susquehanna.
Figure 3.4: Susquehanna River Basin
map of the Susquehanna River Basin Susquehanna River Basin Compact
These needs led to the drafting of the Susquehanna River Basin Compact, which was signed into law on December 24, 1970.
The Compact, as adopted by the Congress of the United States, and the legislatures of New York State, Pennsylvania and Maryland, provides the mechanism to guide the conservation, development, and administration of the water resources of the vast river basin.
Formation of the Susquehanna River Basin Commission
The Compact established the Susquehanna River Basin Commission (SRBC) as the agency to coordinate the water resources efforts of the three states and the federal government.
Each member is represented by a commissioner who serves as the spokesperson for the government that he or she represents.
In the case of the federal government, the commissioner and his alternate are appointed by the President of the United States.
For the three states, the commissioners are the governors or their designees.
The governors also appoint alternate commissioners.
The commissioners, or their alternates, meet periodically to act on applications for projects using water, adopt regulations, and direct planning and management activities affecting the basin's water resources.
Each of the four commissioners has a single vote.
Under the leadership of an Executive Director, technical, administrative, and clerical personnel support the daily operations of the Commission.
Mission
The mission of the Commission is to enhance public welfare through comprehensive planning, water supply allocation, and management of the water resources of the Susquehanna River Basin.
To accomplish this mission, SRBC works to: reduce damages caused by floods; provide for the reasonable and sustained development and use of surface and ground water for municipal, agricultural, recreational, commercial and industrial purposes; protect and restore fisheries, wetlands and aquatic habitat; protect water quality and instream uses; and ensure future availability of flows to the Chesapeake Bay.
The SRBC is uniquely qualified to carry out this mission.
As a federal-interstate compact commission, its focus is defined by the natural boundaries of the river basin rather than the political boundaries of the member states.
As such, the SRBC serves as a forum to provide coordinated management, promote communication among the members, and resolve water resource issues and controversies within the basin.
Commission staff develop and implement the programs as directed by the commissioners and as found in the Commission's comprehensive plan, Comprehensive Plan for the Management and Development of the Water Resources of the Susquehanna Basin.
The six major areas of the Comprehensive Plan and specific Commission functions within them are listed below.
Flood Plain Management 
o Approves flood control projects.
o Assists in establishing flood warning systems.
o Establishes community self-help flood warning programs.
o Advises individuals, communities, businesses, and industries on flood loss reduction.
o Produces flood plain mapping and other information utilized for flood plain management.
Water Supply
o Inventories available water resources.
o Administers and manages interstate water resources.
o Determines the basin's storage needs and allocates water as needed.
o Assists in planning, developing, and financing water resources projects.
o Develops water supply storage and release plans.
o Regulates consumptive water uses.
o Develops data on flow conditions.
o Institutes emergency actions
Water Quality
o Monitors water quality programs of signatory members.
o Conducts special surface and groundwater studies.
o Measures the impact of the Susquehanna River on the ecology of the Chesapeake Bay.
o Provides technical assistance to federal, state, and local governments.
o Conducts basinwide monitoring.
Watershed Protection 
o Promotes protection of wetlands.
o Encourages proper agricultural practices.
o Recommends priorities for suitable uses of certain sensitive land areas.
o Reviews large-scale urban and rural development as it relates to water and wastewater needs.
Recreation, Fish, 
o Seeks development of water-based recreational resources.
o Encourages inclusion of public recreation programs at water resource projects.
o Promotes migratory fish restoration and propagation of indigenous species.
o Regulates releases of water to protect fishery resource and recreational uses.
Cultural, Visual, and Other Amenities
o Assists signatory members in designating and classifying historic and wild and scenic areas.
o Considers the impact of water resource projects on cultural values.
Interstate Commission on the Potomac River Basin
The Interstate Commission on the Potomac River Basin (ICPRB) is a multi-state agency that has worked with federal, state, and local government agencies and citizens to improve water quality in the Potomac watershed since 1940.
The ICPRB works as a partner in the Potomac basin promoting responsible use of water and related land resources of the 14,670 square-mile watershed.
The mission of the ICPRB, as specified in its compact, includes providing:
o Interstate and basinwide coordination of water quality management;
o Technical support for the water quality improvement efforts of the Potomac basin states;
o Liaison with citizen and government groups; and
o Information about the Potomac's water quality issues to the public.
To accomplish these tasks effectively, the ICPRB has five units to work with state and regional agencies and other groups:
o Water Quality: Provides expertise in the analysis of water quality problems using modeling and other methods.
o Water Resources: Works in the region to help coordinate watershed-based management of water and associated landresources.
o Living Resources: Works on improving the health of basin ecosystems and increasing the exchange of biological information.
o Public Affairs: Educates and informs the public, government agencies, and the media about water quality and use concerns in the basin.
o CO-OP: Coordinates cooperative operations and planning among Washington metropolitan area water utilities.
Assures adequate potable water supply from the Potomac and plans for future supplies and demands.
The ICPRB is an interstate compact commission established by an Act of Congress.
The signatory states (Maryland, Pennsylvania, Virginia, and West Virginia), the District of Columbia, and the federal government each appoint three commissioners to the agency.
Products available from the commission include newsletters, reports, maps, and technical studies.
A library containing more than 5,500 volumes related to Potomac basin water quality issues is open to the public.
Some examples of the kinds and range of issues that ICPRB has recently contributed to include:
North Branch Restoration Task Force: The ICPRB directs a watershed task force with representatives from the Corps of Engineers, Maryland, West Virginia, four counties, and the ICPRB.
The task force developed a plan for improving water quality and restoring fisheries resources in the watershed.
The completed plan supports a corps feasibility study, currently in progress, for correcting the major sources of mine drainage.
The task force is continuing to monitor programs through several work groups and also serves as the steering committee for the corps feasibility study.
Participation in the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (Region III) special panel to address combined sewer overflows (CSOs) and stormwater issues in the District of Columbia.
The EPA panel was established under the Federal Agencies Committee of the Chesapeake Bay Program and is composed of the District of Columbia, Maryland, and national water management experts as well as representatives from local stakeholders and citizen groups concerned with surface water quality in the District of Columbia.
The panel was created to provide planning and implementation recommendations for effective CSO and stormwater control programs.
Coordinating the efforts of a group of investigators to explore possible causes of the food chain problems in brackish (salty) open water habitats in the Chesapeake Bay and the lower Potomac.
Signs of trouble include a high incidence (~12%) of lesions in large striped bass observed in the bay and the lower Potomac during 1997 and 1998, declines in important forage fish species (e.g., Atlantic menhaden and bay anchovy), large declines in the zooplankton food base, a five-fold increase in ctenophores (comb jellyfish) which prey on fish larvae and zooplankton, undesirable shifts in the phytoplankton community, and declines in mid-bay submerged aquatic vegetation.
The ICPRB continues to expand efforts to work with federal and state agencies and local watershed groups to address water quality and living resources problems.
Since 1988, the ICPRB has worked on an integrated assessment of the Potomac Estuary.
As a component of this project, the ICPRB will complete an integrated assessment of non-tidal streams and rivers of the Potomac basin by the year 2000.
Chesapeake Bay Critical Area Program
The Critical Area Commission was established by law in 1984 to develop a protection program for the vitally important land and water resources of the Chesapeake Bay and its tributaries.
The "Critical Area" consists of all land within 1,000 feet of the Mean High Water Line of tidal waters or the landward edge of tidal wetlands or tributary streams.
It also includes the tidal waters themselves, and the land under those waters.
Sixty-one counties and towns in Maryland are affected by the Critical Area Law.
The Critical Area Commission consists of 27 members appointed by the Governor.
The members represent a variety of public and private interest groups, including State and local governments, developers, environmentalists, foresters, and farmers.
The Commission also has a Chairman, an Executive Director and staff who oversee implementation of the Critical Area Law.
The Commission was charged with developing a Critical Area Protection Program to meet the following three goals:
o
Minimize adverse impacts on water quality that result from pollutants that are discharged from structures or conveyances that have run off from surrounding lands;
Conserve fish, wildlife, and plant habitat in the Critical Area; and
Establish land use policies for development in the Chesapeake Bay Critical Area which accommodate growth and also address the fact that, even if pollution is controlled, the number, movement, and activities of persons in an area can create adverse environmental impacts.
To carry out its goals, the Commission established criteria for the protection of the Critical Area.
These criteria would help minimize the adverse effects of human activities on water quality and natural habitats and would foster consistent, uniform and more sensitive development activity within the Critical Area.
The Critical Area Criteria are minimum standards established for local jurisdictions.
In cooperation with the Critical Area Commission , local critical area management programs are administered by the 61 local governments whose jurisdiction are partially or entirely within the Critical Area.
The Critical Area Commission coordinates and provides technical assistance to local jurisdictions to ensure consistency of local programs implementation and reviews projects that are located in the Critical Area.
Each jurisdiction adopted its own local Critical Area Program based on the Criteria promulgated by the Commission.
The Critical Area Law recognizes the primary responsibility of local governments for land use decisions and implemented the program in this fashion to allow local flexibility to accommodate unique local circumstances.
As such, most jurisdictions' Critical Area Programs differ from one another.
Applications for common forms of planning, zoning, and subdivision actions are made by the landowner to the Office of Planning and Zoning in the jurisdiction in which the property is located.
Local governments are given the flexibility to meet unusual or unique circumstances such as unwarranted hardship to an applicant.
Sometimes important and worthwhile projects do not specifically meet all the Critical Area Criteria.
In these instances, variances may be provided if the project meets the goals of the criteria and follows the regulations as closely as possible.
Land within the Critical Area is categorized by its predominant use and the intensity of its development.
This system allows local governments to focus new development toward existing developed areas and permits some infill of similar density.
It also allows them to designate natural resources areas for habitat protection and for forestry, agriculture and other resource utilization activities.
Each classification or category poses different challenges for land managers attempting to achieve the goals of the Critical Area Law and so the specific management programs for each differ.
But the intention of each of the programs remains consistent -- to protect the Chesapeake Bay from the ill effects of human activities.
The three land classifications are Intensely Developed Areas, Limited Development Areas, and Resource Conservation Areas.
Intensely Developed Areas (IDAs) are defined as areas of twenty of more adjacent acres where residential, commercial, institutional or industrial land uses predominate.
IDAs are areas of concentrated development where little natural habitat occurs.
Limited Development Areas (LDAs) are areas in which development is of a low or moderate intensity.
LDAs contain areas of natural plant and animal habitats but are not dominated by agriculture, wetland, forest, barren land, surface water or open space.
The quality of runoff from these areas has not been substantially altered or impaired.
Housing densities in LDAs are between one dwelling unit per five acres and four dwelling units per acre.
Areas with IDA characteristics but with fewer than 20 acres are classified LDA.
Resource Conservation Areas (RCAs) are characterized by natural environments or by resource-utilization activities.
Resource-utilization refers to such activities as agriculture, aquaculture, commercial forestry and fisheries activities which the Criteria consider protected land uses.
The Critical Area Law also requires that each local jurisdiction identify and provide for the establishment, preservation, and maintenance of Habitat Protection Areas.
These areas include: naturally vegetated 100-foot buffer (the Buffer); nontidal wetlands; the habitats of threatened and endangered species, and species in need of conservation, and their habitat; significant plant and wildlife habitat; and, anadromous fish-spawning areas.
To accommodate future growth, local jurisdictions are authorized under the Critical Area Act to change a land use designation and allow development at a density or intensity which exceeds the limits of a site's original designation.
Local governments may use a portion of its growth allocation to change a designation from Resource Conservation Area to either Limited Development Area or Intensely Developed Area or to change a Limited Development Area to an Intensely Developed Area.
The following limitations apply to a local government's use of growth allocation:
o A jurisdiction's growth allocation reserve consists of the number of acres representing five percent of its Resource Conservation Area lands, minus Federal property and tidal wetlands.
o All Critical Area requirements relating to Habitat Protection Areas must be met regardless of the new land use designation.
o A local jurisdiction must follow certain guidelines when deciding to change a Critical Area designation through the use of growth allocation.
These guidelines provide that new development should be located:
o within or adjacent to existing developed areas;
o in an area and in a manner that optimizes benefits to water quality;
o at least 300 feet beyond the landward edge of tidal waters and tidal wetlands; and,
o for new Intensely Developed Areas, that they are located where they minimize impacts to adjacent Resource Conservation Areas.
o When growth allocation is approved by a local jurisdiction, the Commission must approve the change in land use designation as an amendment to the local program.
The Commission's standard for review is that an amendment must be consistent with the goals and Criteria of the Critical Area Program.
Each jurisdiction within the Critical Area implements its own local program.
Through its oversight role, the Critical Area Commission ensures that the proper amount of growth allocation acreage is deducted from a jurisdiction's reserve and that Habitat Protection Areas are properly identified and protected.
Locational decisions are the purview of the local jurisdiction.
Growth Management
Background
Three hundred and fifty years ago the geographical area now comprising the State of Maryland was almost completely forested.
Over time the landscape has undergone tremendous change.
Today, Maryland is approximately 44% forested with most of these forests occurring in Western Maryland.
As Maryland's population continues to grow, more natural lands will be lost to development.
Currently, 11% of the State's land is developed.
The loss of natural cover (forests, meadows, wetlands etc.) to developed land uses has caused a decline in water quality and aquatic resources.
Research studies conducted across the country have documented the link between impervious cover (i.e., roads, roof tops, parking lots) in a watershed and the decline of water quality and stream health.
Nonpoint source pollution is the State's leading cause of water quality impairment and urbanization is major contributor of nonpoint source pollution.
It has become recognized that controlling the impact of development is one of the most important steps that can be taken to reduce nonpoint source pollution.
This is generally achieved at two levels.
At one level it is important to protect natural undeveloped lands from development through managed growth.
At the second level it is important to reduce the impact of development where it does occur.
In other words, how we develop is as important as where we develop.
Impacts of Imperviousness
Most of the precipitation that falls onto heavily vegetated landscapes either evaporates, transpires from plants, or infiltrates into the ground.
As vegetative cover is replaced with impervious cover (streets, parking lots, roof tops etc.), the water cycle is disrupted and runoff increases.
Increased runoff and a reduced groundwater recharge damage stream systems.
During heavy storm events, banks become scoured which causes erosion and sedimentation, and over time streams may become channelized.
As the groundwater table drops, streams loose water volume.
These and numerous other impacts impair water quality and create inhabitable conditions for living organisms.
The Maryland Department of Natural Resources, Monitoring and Non-Tidal Assessment Division has conducted the Maryland Biological Stream Survey (MBSS) and has investigated the association between land-use and the health stream biota.
The Survey analyzed the correlation between urbanization and various indices of biological integrity.
Results of the survey indicate that with increased urbanization, in all or most of the basins, fish and macroinvertebrate biological integrity, and aquatic salamander abundance decline.
Where to Develop
Placing development in areas suitable for development and away from rural areas is one of the most effective ways to reduce the consumption of land.
While land-use planning is the primary role of county governments, the legislature has enhanced the State's ability to guide land-use through various pieces of growth management legislation.
As a result, Maryland has become one the most progressive states in the nation on the issue of addressing sprawl development.
Economic Growth , Resource Protection and Planning Act
On October 1, 1992, the Maryland Economic Growth, Resource Protection and Planning Act of 1992 was enacted to reshape the way citizens, developers, the State, counties and towns address planning for growth and resource protection.
A premise of the Act is that the comprehensive plans prepared by counties and towns are the best place for local governments to establish priorities for growth and resource conservation, and that once those priorities are established, it is the State's aim to provide technical assistance to assist in resource conservation.
The visions of the Planning Act
The Act promulgated seven visions for managing growth:
o Development is concentrated in suitable areas;
o Sensitive areas are protected;
o In rural areas, growth is directed to existing population centers and resource areas are protected;
o Stewardship of the Chesapeake Bay and the land is a universal ethic;
o Conservation of resources, including a reduction in resource consumption, is practiced;
o To assure the achievement of 1 through 5 above, economic growth is encouraged and regulatory mechanisms are streamlined; and
o Funding mechanisms are addressed to achieve these visions.
Making these visions part of Maryland's planning and zoning enabling legislation gives jurisdictions a succinct statement of Maryland's priorities for their plans.
Counties throughout Maryland have incorporated these visions into their comprehensive plans.
New "Sensitive Areas Element" required in Local Plans
Article 66B required that plans prepared by local jurisdictions contain a series of "plan elements" such as a land use element, a community facility element and a variety of others.
In addition, all comprehensive plans prepared by local jurisdictions must include a sensitive areas element that contains goals, objectives, principles, and standards designed to protect sensitive areas from the adverse effects of development.
These areas include the following:
o streams and their buffers;
o 100-year floodplains;
o habitats of threatened and endangered species; and
o steep slopes
The sensitive areas element may also include other areas in need of special protection, as determined in the local comprehensive plan.
Most local jurisdictions have environmental policies, goals, and objectives in their comprehensive plans.
Also, most jurisdictions have environmental laws and regulations.
However, the environmental resources which are subject to local plans and regulations vary from jurisdiction to jurisdiction.
The Act therefore seeks protection of at least the above mentioned types of sensitive areas.
The Act permits local governments to define sensitive areas and determine the levels of protection.
Smart Growth and Neighborhood Conservation Initiatives
In its 1997 Session, the Maryland General Assembly strengthened Maryland's effort to guide growth by enacting the Neighborhood Conservation and Smart Growth Initiatives.
This legislative package marshaled the State's financial resources to support growth in Maryland's communities and to limit development in agricultural and other resource areas.
The Smart Growth Initiatives build upon and enhance the Economic Growth, Resource Protection, and Planning Act of 1992.
The centerpiece of this legislative package is the "Smart Growth Areas" legislation.
The law limits most state infrastructure funding and economic development, housing and other program monies to those places local governments determine suitable for growth, called "Priority Funding Areas."
This serves two objectives: It lends fiscal support to the local jurisdictions' choices for development areas.
However, it also assures that the State will not fund infrastructure in rural areas where development is undesired.
The Act designates specific PFAs throughout Maryland, including muncipalities, land inside the Baltimore Beltway, the Maryland portion of land within the Capital Beltway, and enterprise zones.
Counties may also designate PFAs based on the land use, water and sewer service, and residential density criteria contained in the Act.
The Act gives local governments flexibility to identify and determine the boundaries of communities, rural villages, and other public investment centers that will constitute Priority Funding Areas.
The counties comprehensive plan should be used to guide the mapping of PFAs in order to avoid arbitrary or capricious designations.
The other bills of this legislative package also support locally-identified development areas.
They facilitate the re-use of brownfields and provide tax credits to businesses creating jobs in a priority funding area.
A new Live Near Your Work pilot program supports this effort by providing cash contributions to workers buying homes in certain older neighborhoods.
All of these measures will encourage economic development and help stabilize older developed areas.
To spur more preservation of undeveloped land, the Rural Legacy Program provides financial resources for the protection of farm and forest lands and the conservation of these essential rural resources from development.
Rural Legacy Program
The purpose of the Rural Legacy Program is to protect Maryland's remaining rural landscapes and natural areas through the purchase of land or conservation easements.
The Rural Legacy Initiative is a "bottom up" program that must be initiated or endorsed by the appropriate local government.
Local governments work in cooperation with land trusts and individual citizens to identify Rural Legacy Areas.
The Rural Legacy Program will establish greenbelts of forests and farms around rural communities, protect critical native wildlife and plant habitat from development, support natural resource based economies, and protect riparian forests, wetlands and greenways that buffer Maryland's valuable tributaries and bays from pollution runoff.
Through a combination of existing parkland aquisition funds (Program Open Space) and general obligation bonds issued by the State, the Rural Legacy Program will fund a minimum of $71.3 million in grants during the first five years of the program, and conserve up to 200,000 acres by the year 2011.
In FY 98/99, the program's inaugural year, 20 counties submitted applications proposing 23 Rural Legacy Areas (RLAs) to protect 54,000 acres of land valued at $129 million, demonstrating that the program was popular and competition for funding high.
In all, the state designated 16 RLAs and committed $29 million to protect 14,000 acres.
For FY 2000, Governor Glendening announced an additional $25 million to protect more than 12,000 acres.
Combining the dollars from the first two years of the program's existence, the state now has dedicated $54 million to preserve more than 26,000 acres.
In doing so, the Governor designated six new Rural Legacy Areas and announced continued funding for 13 previously approved ones.
Brownfields Program
"Brownsfields" are either abandoned or underutilized industrial sites that are either polluted or perceived to be polluted.
While often strategically located near population and major transportation hubs, these sites are unattractive because of the uncertainty and risks involved in clean-up costs and future liability.
The 1997 law limits liability for those redeveloping these lands, unless they exacerbate contamination or create new pollution.
The Law created a voluntary clean-up program operated by the Maryland Department of the Environment.
An eligible developer wishing to participate must supply the Department information about environmental conditions, including contamination on the site and proposed clean-up procedures.
If MDE approves this application, the applicant prepares a detailed Response Action Plan which explains all tasks necessary to clean up the site and demonstrates that the project meets applicable public health and environmental protection criteria.
Once the plan is approved, the Department inspects all work on site before issuing a certificate of completion.
The certificate provides that the applicable clean up criteria have been met.
The law also established the Brownfields Revitalization Incentive Program.
This Program provides grants and low interest loans to fund brownfields redevelopment.
How to Develop
Consider this fact: over the next 20 years alone, the amount of land consumed by development in Maryland could surpass the amount of land developed over the last 200 years.
Through the 1997 Smart Growth initiative and other growth management programs, Maryland is working to reduce sprawl development and its impacts.
In spite of these efforts, the development of new land is a reality.
Therefore, how we build becomes critical in efforts to manage the environmental impacts of future growth and development.
The following are the state supported programs or initiatives that aid in reducing the "footprint" of development.
Low-Impact Development
Prince George's County Maryland has been the leader in developing the low-impact development technique.
The basic objectives of the low-impact development approach include: 1) restoring the site hydrologic regime to mimic the natural or predevelopment condition, 2) maintaining surface water and groundwater quality and minimizing the generation and off-site transport of pollutants, 3) minimizing disturbance of riparian habitat functions , and 4) preserving terrestrial habitat ecological functions and maximizing conservation of woodland and vegetative cover.
The Maryland Department of Natural Resources, Watershed Restoration Division (WRD) is working with Prince Georges County in investigating the use of low-impact development (LID) techniques to protect water quality.
WRD is currently experimenting with the LID technique.
With State Highway Administration funds, WRD built two bioretention facilities in the DNR building parking lot.
Bioretention facilities attempt to mimic the natural landscape processes by filtering polluted stormwater runoff.
These facilities, which contain highly organic soil, trees and shrubs, and sand and gravel, act to filter pollutants such as nutrients, metals, oil, grease and sediments.
Clean Water Act Section 319 funds have been used to monitor project effectiveness.
Green Building Program
Conventional land development and building practices are frequently at odds with environmental protection.
Sites are developed in a way that disrupt hydrology, create more impervious surface than is necessary, cause excessive erosion, degrade natural ecosystem function and disrupt native biodiversity.
Buildings are frequently designed and constructed in a way that consume too many precious natural resources and generate excessive waste.
The Mission of the Maryland's Green Building Program is to facilitate change in the way land development occurs throughout the State by increasing the awareness and use of environmentally responsible building practices, materials and site designs that provide comfortable, affordable and healthier buildings.
While many similar programs across the country focus solely on buildings, Maryland's program takes a holistic approach by also focusing on the impact of buildings on the landscape.
It is recognized that some elements of green building have more of an impact on controlling nonpoint source pollution than others.
For example, the Green Building Program promotes the use of environmentally sensitive site design, including low-impact development, and it is believed that these approaches directly aid in protecting watersheds.
On the other hand, building energy efficiency is typically not seen as a nonpoint source pollution technique.
However, water quality, and overall environmentally quality, would improve if the use of petroleum based fuel was dramatically reduced in lieu of renewable fuel sources.
Lakes
Introduction
While Maryland has no large, naturally-occurring lakes, there are many hundreds of reservoirs in the state created by stream or river impoundments and many lagoons or pools created by berm construction and mined pits or quarries.
Many of these lakes are open to the public for recreational uses such as fishing, swimming, and boating.
These water bodies often are overshadowed by the overwhelming commercial and recreational importance of the nearby Chesapeake Bay, but they are valuable and important water resources to the state and its citizens.
Compared to some other states, most of Maryland's lakes are relatively small (Table 3.6) and privately owned.
Yet, lakes with public access are located in almost every county, making recreational access to these waters a short trip from anywhere in the state.
Table 3.6 Summary of federal, public, and private lakes, ponds, and reservoirs in Maryland.
Lake Size Number of lakes Total acreage less than 10 acres 562 2,958.0 10 to 500 acres 370 15,662.0 greater than 500 acres 15 59,344.0 TOTAL 947 77,965.0
(Source: US Environmental Protection Agency, 1991)
Maryland's definition of "significant, publicly-owned lakes" does not include industrial or municipal waste treatment lagoons, stormwater management ponds, or "run-of-the-river" lakes in which impoundments are formed in a river behind relatively low dams.
Some quasi-public lakes are included because of their importance as public water supplies and recreational resources (e.g., Washington Suburban Sanitary Commission reservoirs).
Lakes and reservoirs on federal property are excluded since public access and use of these lakes often is restricted or prohibited.
Many lake managers or owners do not have control of the contributing watersheds.
Partnerships like those established for the Baltimore City reservoirs and the Patuxent Reservoirs are necessary to maintain lake water quality.
Lake Pollution Control Measures
Compared to streams and rivers, lakes are relatively still.
The minimal movement in the water allows suspended sediments (and associated metals, pesticides, and nutrients) to settle to the bottom.
The sediment covers aquatic habitat and reduces the lake volume.
Nutrients carried into the lake or released from the sediment are used by phytoplankton and higher aquatic plants.
An abundance of these nutrients can trigger algal blooms - an overabundance of phytoplankton.
The die off and degradation of the algae lowers dissolved oxygen levels and can cause fish kills and create taste and odor problems.
The natural "aging" or eutrophication process is accelerated by human activities, such as agriculture and urbanization, which increase the amount of sediment, nutrients, and toxic materials entering the lake.
Successful restoration and management programs can extend the life of the lake and provide abundant aquatic habitat and recreational opportunities.
Lake restoration techniques address the in-lake symptoms of eutrophication while control procedures or techniques focus on the sources of lake eutrophication.
Eutrophication control efforts reduce nutrient and sediment input to lakes from both point and nonpoint sources of pollution.
Nonpoint Source Controls
Nonpoint source runoff (urban/suburban, agricultural, and forest) accounts for much of the nutrient load entering impounded waters.
These nutrients (particularly phosphorus) are often associated with sediment.
Controlling sediment from these nonpoint sources, therefore, is critical for phosphorus load reduction.
Pollutant controls focus on structural devices and land treatments that intercept or reduce pollutant loadings and regulatory programs that mandate the use of best management practices (BMPs) on adjacent lands.
These control procedures are also used to reduce excessive levels of bacteria and toxic materials.
The controls include, but are not limited to: the use of wetlands and forest management programs around lakes and reservoirs to trap and reduce nutrients; the establishment of agricultural BMPs on farms; and the effective control of stormwater runoff from urban and suburban development.
Lake Restoration Programs
Restoration of impaired water bodies requires ecosystem rehabilitation techniques to restore the beneficial uses.
In Maryland, most lakes are not actively managed largely due to the lack of funds for a management program.
Some lake managers are using innovative management techniques and tools to control eutrophication in their lakes.
The methods used depend on the nature and severity of the problems.
Results from a survey of lake managers in 1993 identified several active lake management programs, including aquatic plant management (using herbicides, harvesting, and drawdowns), erosion control, implementation of BMPs in the lake watershed, installation of in-lake sediment traps, creation of fish habitat, and collection of debris.
About half of the lake managers reported having a water quality monitoring effort and about two-thirds of the managers had established goals.
Lake management programs and regulations, however, had been implemented in only about 40 percent of the lakes.
The current status of these programs is not known.
Clean Lakes (Section 314) Program
The Clean Lakes Program is a federal grant program established in 1972 as Section 314 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act to provide financial and technical assistance to states in restoring publicly-owned lakes.
The initial focus of the program was on research, development of lake restoration techniques, and the evaluation of lake conditions.
In 1980, Clean Lakes Program regulations (40 CFR 35 Subpart H) directed program managers to diagnose the current condition of lakes and their watersheds, determine the extent and sources of pollution, develop feasible lake restoration and protection plans (Phase I Diagnostic/Feasibility Studies), and implement these plans (Phase II Restoration/Protection Implementation Projects).
Since 1979, Maryland has received more than $2.4 million in Clean Lakes cost-share funds.
About one-tenth of these funds ($244,000) was used to support Phase I diagnostic studies, but most of the funds ($2,040,022) supported the more expensive Phase II restoration activities.
No Phase III post-restoration projects have been funded in Maryland.
In 1995, Congress rescinded funds for the Clean Lakes Program, effectively cutting off future funding through that section of the Clean Water Act.
Ongoing Clean Lakes projects were permitted to be completed; in Maryland, the last Clean Lakes grants were officially closed in December, 1996.
Following Congressional withdrawal of Clean Lakes funds in 1995, EPA issued new guidance for implementing state nonpoint source activities funded under Section 319.
Key aspects of the guidance include an allowance of the use of Section 319 funds to update state nonpoint source programs including a new section entitled "Lake Protection and Restoration Activities."
Clean Lakes Program Phase I, II, and III projects and lake water quality assessments are eligible for funding under Section 319 grants.
States are encouraged to fund "Clean Lakes" programs with Section 319 funds, although these funds cannot be used for in-lake work, such as aquatic macrophyte harvesting or dredging, unless the sources of pollution to the lake have already been addressed.
Maryland's Source Water Assessment Program
The 1996 Safe Drinking Water Act Amendments require that states develop and implement source water assessment programs to evaluate the safety of all public drinking water systems.
Source water assessments evaluate public drinking water supply vulnerability to contamination.
An assessment does not address the treatment processes, or the storage and distribution aspects of the water system.
MDE is the lead agency for administering the Source Water Assessment Program.
In 1999, after receiving significant input from a Technical Advisory Group (representing public water systems, various government agencies, industry associations, and the Potomac and Susquehanna River Commissions) and a Citizens Advisory Group (representing various environmental and political organizations, watershed protection groups, and health organizations) MDE submitted its final draft of the program to EPA.
EPA approved Maryland's Source Water Assessment Plan in November, 1999.
This plan will evaluate the safety of public drinking water sources.
Public drinking water systems are broken down into three major categories: community systems, nontransient noncommmunity systems, and transient noncommunity systems.
Community systems are water systems that serve 25 or more year-round residents, and include many small communities as well as large systems such as the Baltimore City Water System and the Washington Suburban Sanitary Commission.
Nontransient noncommunity systems serve 25 or more individuals each day who regularly use the water system for 6 months per year or more.
The nontransient noncommunity systems include such facilities as schools and places of employment that use their own wells.
The transient noncommunity systems serve 25 or more people daily, but not the same people every day.
Restaurants and campgrounds with their own wells are typical transient noncommunity water systems.
Domestic wells serving individual homes are not included in this program.
The plan uses three main tools for assessing drinking water sources: source water delineation, contaminant surveys, and susceptibility analysis.
The information gained through these tools will be used to explain the susceptibility of a water supply source to contaminants that may affect the safety of drinking water.
With this information, local governments and water suppliers in partnership with MDE and other agencies can develop water supply protection programs to improve the integrity of each water supply in the state.
Maryland plans to complete the assessment process by May 2003.
For source water assessment of ground water, MDE is building upon the work of its Monitoring Waiver Program and its Wellhead Protection Program.
The Monitoring Waiver Program established definitions and criteria for sources to be classified as confined aquifers and established procedures for reviewing potential contaminant sources within a fixed distance of wells.
The waiver program helped prioritize the sampling of Maryland's water systems for pesticide and organic chemical analysis.
Information on contaminant sources collected under the waiver program and associated monitoring will be instrumental for beginning the assessment process.
The Wellhead Protection Program has focused on community systems (1,000 or more people) using unconfined aquifers.
Wellhead protection areas have been delineated, potential sources of contamination have been identified and an assessment of the risk and management recommendations have been made for these systems.
Source water assessments for these systems will be completed by updating the wellhead protection studies with current sources, new land use maps and reviewing the most recent contaminant inventory and monitoring data described in the program document.
______________________________________________________________
Return to Table of Contents
